District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.16

Rulemaking.

The Mayor, pursuant to title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
This section is referenced in § 47-351.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-351.16.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.